Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.050

Receipts from motor vehicle fund to road fund.

Any funds accruing to the credit of any county from the motor vehicle fund shall be paid monthly to the county treasurer and deposited in the county road fund.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.82.050. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 8, part; RRS s 6450-8, part.]